Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202542-905
Comprehensive support services; enumerated.

The comprehensive support services shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) Emergency services for victims of abuse and their families;

(2) Support programs that meet specific needs of victims of abuse and their families;

(3) Education, counseling, and supportive programs for the abuser;

(4) Programs to aid in the prevention and elimination of domestic violence which shall include education and public awareness; and

(5) Assistance in completing the standard petition and affidavit forms for persons who file a petition and affidavit for a domestic abuse protection order under the Protection Orders Act.

Laws 1978, LB 623, § 5;

Laws 1989, LB 330, § 6;

Laws 1998, LB 218, § 19;

Laws 2025, LB80, § 41.

Protection Orders Act, see section 26-101.